Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="d/ez__v">
<e><p><l>iez</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euz</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euz</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iaz</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iaz</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iaznwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iez</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iaznwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iaznwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCa</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCa</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCanwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCanwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzCanwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCa</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCa</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCanwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCanwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizCanwi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizli</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizlu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizlu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizla</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizla</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizle</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizlA</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizle</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizle</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWili</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWilu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWilu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWila</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWila</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWile</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWilA</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWile</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWile</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWili</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWilu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWilu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWila</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWila</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWile</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWilA</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWile</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizWile</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizbi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizbu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizbu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizbe</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizbe</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eizbe</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWibi</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWibu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWibu</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWiba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWiba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWiba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzWiba</l><r>ez<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="dez"><i>d</i><par n="d/ez__v"/></e>
